Utah statutes.
53A-6-205.   Effect of compact on other state laws and regulations.

(1)  Nothing in this compact shall be construed to repeal or otherwise modify any law or regulation of a party state relating to the approval of programs of educational preparation having effect solely on the qualification of educational personnel within that state.

(2)  To the extent that contracts made pursuant to this compact deal with the educational requirements for the proper qualification of educational personnel, acceptance of a program of educational preparation shall be in accordance with such procedures and requirements as may be provided in the applicable contract.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

